Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

As to style of process, see art. 5, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to service of process on foreign corporations, see §

1-5-107

.

For authority of court commissioners to compel attendance of witnesses by process in connection with probate matters, see §

2-2-107

.

As to service of process outside state, see §

5-1-107

.

As to issuance of process by clerks of court, see §

5-7-102

.

As to process powers of circuit court, see §

5-9-133

.

As to service of process on first-class cities, see §

15-3-102

.

As to service of process on counties, see §

18-2-110

.

As to service of subpoena issued by county assessor by sheriff without charge, see §

18-3-204

.

As to service of notice on county commissioner with reference to removal from office, see §

18-3-523

.

As to execution of process by sheriff and deputies, see §

18-3-604

.

As to service of process on sheriff, see §

18-3-605

.

For provision requiring petition to be served with summons in connection with removal of county officer from office, see §

18-3-902

.

As to service of notice of suspension of county officer pending outcome of removal proceedings, see §

18-3-903

.

As to service of process in connection with military courts, see §

19-12-106

.

As to service of process on guardian and county attorney in actions for divorce based on insanity, see §

20-2-105

.

As to service of process on insurance commissioner, see §

26-2-126

.

As to service of process on surplus line insurer, see §

26-11-120

.

As to service of summons in suits by Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, see §

30-5-111

.

As to service of process on temporary or transient merchants, see §

33-20-207

.

For duty of temporary or transient merchant required to post bond to appoint county clerk as agent for service of process in suit on bonds, see §

33-20-207

.

As to service of notice in connection with hearings by public service commission, see §

37-2-202

.

For authority of public service commission to issue subpoenas, etc., see §

37-2-206

.

As to service of process in connection with actions and proceedings in court arising under laws relative to public utilities and public service commission, see §

37-2-220

.

As to duty of nonresident wholesale dealers in cigarettes to appoint secretary of state as agent for service of process, see §

39-18-106

.

As to service of process in connection with civil actions to collect delinquent use taxes, see §

39-16-108

.

As to service of process in connection with multilevel and pyramid distributorship, see §§

40-3-109

,

40-3-110

and

40-3-112

.

As to service of process on nonresidents in regard to copyrighted music, see §

40-13-108

.

As to service of process in action to collect delinquent state bonds in connection with irrigation drainage districts, see §

41-6-206

.

As to service of notice with reference to formation of irrigation districts, see §

41-7-204

.

As to process, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

As to service and filing of pleadings and other papers, see Rule 5, W.R.C.P.

For provision allowing additional time after service by mail, see Rule 6(d), W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

51 Am. Jur. 2d Lis Pendens § 1 et seq.

§ 1-6-101.
Endorsement by sheriff required.

The sheriff shall endorse
upon every writ or order, the day and hour it was received by him.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 2356; R.S. 1899, § 3439; C.S. 1910, § 4282; C.S. 1920, § 5551; R.S. 1931, § 89-211; C.S. 1945, § 3-902; W.S. 1957, § 1-39; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-6-102.
Service of process when sheriff is an interested party.

When the sheriff is a
party or is interested in an action, process shall be directed to
and executed by a person over the age of eighteen (18) years, not
a party to the action, appointed for that purpose by the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 2367; R.S. 1899, § 3440; C.S. 1910, § 4283; C.S. 1920, § 5552; R.S. 1931, § 89-212; C.S. 1945, § 3-903; W.S. 1957, § 1-40; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1985, ch. 212, § 3; 1993, ch. 1, § 1.

Service by coroner may be quashed if sheriff is not party.
—

Where the sheriff is a party to the case, the duty of serving process devolves upon the coroner, though the court may quash such service if it finds that the sheriff was not a party within the meaning of this section. Clause v. Columbia Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 16 Wyo. 450, 95 P. 54,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1908) (decided under former §

7-4-103

).

Cited

in

Hurlbut v. Scarbrough, 957 P.2d 839,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1998); Merrill v. Jansma, 2004 WY 26, 86 P.3d 270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(2004).

§ 1-6-103.
Appointment to serve particular process or order.

For good cause the court
may appoint a person to serve a particular process or order, who has
the same power as the sheriff to execute it. The person may be appointed
on the motion of the party who obtains the process or order, and the
return must be verified by affidavit. He is entitled to the fees allowed
the sheriff for similar services.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 22; R.S. 1887, § 2358; R.S. 1899, § 3441; C.S. 1910, § 4284; C.S. 1920, § 5553; R.S. 1931, § 89-213; C.S. 1945, § 3-904; W.S. 1957, § 1-41; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-6-104.
Duties of sheriff.

The sheriff shall execute
every summons, order or other process, return the same as required
by law, and exercise the powers conferred and perform the duties enjoined
upon him by statute and by the common law.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 23; R.S. 1887, § 2359; R.S. 1899, § 3442; C.S. 1910, § 4285; C.S. 1920, § 5554; R.S. 1931, § 89-214; C.S. 1945, § 3-905; W.S. 1957, § 1-42; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-6-105.
Proceedings when defendants not all served.

When service has been made on one (1) or more defendants, but not on all, the plaintiff may proceed as follows:

If the action is against defendants jointly indebted upon contract, he may proceed against the defendants served, unless the court otherwise directs; or

If the action is against defendants severally liable, he may without prejudice to his rights against those not served, proceed against the defendants served.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 105; R.S. 1887, § 2441; R.S. 1899, § 3527; C.S. 1910, § 4373; C.S. 1920, § 5643; R.S. 1931, § 89-824; C.S. 1945, § 3-906; W.S. 1957, § 1-43; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-6-106.
Lis pendens; generally.

When a summons has been
served or publication made, the action is pending so as to charge
third persons with notice of its pendency, and while pending no interest
can be acquired by third persons in the subject matter thereof as
against the plaintiff’s title.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 106; R.S. 1887, § 2442; R.S. 1899, § 3528; C.S. 1910, § 4374; C.S. 1920, § 5644; R.S. 1931, § 89-825; C.S. 1945, § 3-907; W.S. 1957, § 1-44; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that filing of petition for organization of power district constitutes lis pendens as to lands described therein, see §

37-7-107

.

As to filing of petition for organization of irrigation districts as a lis pendens against all lands described therein from and after the filing thereof, see §

41-7-209

.

Territorial scope of lis pendens. —

The doctrine of lis pendens has no efficacy outside the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the action is pending. Ludvik v. James S. Jackson Co., 635 P.2d 1135,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 381

(Wyo. 1981).

Admissions

by defendants in answer to former action by plaintiffs to cancel oil and gas lease that it was void was binding on defendants therein and, under this section, were binding on corporation which contracted to develop lands. Hall Oil Co. v. Barquin, 33 Wyo. 92, 237 P. 255,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1925).

Pendency of administration proceedings

is not notice to one dealing with the administratrix in regard to land to which she holds the legal title that the estate has an interest in the land. Seibel v. Bath, 5 Wyo. 409, 40 P. 756,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1895).

Priorities. —

Under this section, where mortgage was delivered and recorded pending a suit to enforce an agreement to give a mortgage, the mortgage decreed in favor of plaintiff held to have priority over the mortgage so delivered and recorded. Walter v. Kressman, 25 Wyo. 292, 169 P. 3,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1917).

Property held by receiver. —

A creditor cannot interfere with the rights of property placed by the court into the hands of a receiver and taken possession of by the latter, and this rule applies even though a claimant's lien is paramount to the right of the receiver. When property has passed into the hands of a receiver, it is not subject to execution. Tibbals v. Graham, 50 Wyo. 277, 61 P.2d 279,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1936), overruled, Texas W. Oil & Gas Corp. v. First Interstate Bank, 743 P.2d 857,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 514

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Olson v. Leith, 71 Wyo. 316, 257 P.2d 342,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1953).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Spriggs v. District Court, 76 Wyo. 128, 301 P.2d 550,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(1956); Wyo. Bank & Trust v. Haught, 2003 WY 111, 76 P.3d 301,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2003); Grommet v. Newman, 2009 WY 150, 220 P.3d 795,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Dec. 10, 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duration of operation of lis pendens as dependent upon diligent prosecution of suit, 8 ALR2d 986.

New or successive notice of lis pendens in same or new action after loss or cancellation of original notice, 52 ALR2d 1308.

Notice by judicial proceedings of adverse possession between cotenants, 82 ALR2d 5.

Propriety of filing of lis pendens in action affecting leasehold interest, 67 ALR3d 747.

Lis pendens in suit to compel stock transfer, 48 ALR4th 731.

Lis pendens: grounds for cancellation prior to termination of underlying action, absent claim of delay, 49 ALR4th 242.

Library References.

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
92.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-6-107.
Lis pendens; recordation when real property situate in other counties;
constructive notice.

After filing an action
in a court of competent jurisdiction the subject matter of which is
the title to real property located in one (1) or more counties in
this state, the plaintiff may file a certified copy of the complaint
or a sworn notice of the pendency of the action in the office of the
county clerk in the county or counties in which the real property
is located. The notice shall contain the names of the parties, the
object of the action and a description of the property before it shall
operate as constructive notice to third parties in such counties.
Notice shall be effective in the county where the action is filed
without filing a document with the county clerk of that county. Constructive
notice shall be effective as to property in the county in which the
complaint is filed as of the date the complaint is filed and shall
be effective as to property in any other county as of the date on
which the notice is filed in the clerk’s office of that county.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 107; R.S. 1887, § 2443; R.S. 1899, § 3529; C.S. 1910, § 4375; C.S. 1920, § 5645; R.S. 1931, § 89-826; C.S. 1945, § 3-908; W.S. 1957, § 1-45; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1995, ch. 109, § 1.

§ 1-6-108.
Lis pendens; notice of pendency of action affecting real property
or action between husband and wife.

In an action in a state
court or in a United States district court affecting the title or
right of possession of real property, or in an action between husband
and wife, the plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and the
defendant at the time of filing his pleading when affirmative relief
is claimed or at any time afterward, may file in the office of the
county clerk in which the property is situate a notice of pendency
of the action containing the names of the parties, the object of the
action or defense and a description of the property in that county
affected thereby as provided by W.S.

1-6-107

. From the time of filing the notice a subsequent purchaser
or encumbrancer of the property shall have constructive notice of
the pendency of the action.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 31, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 97-301; C.S. 1945, § 3-909; W.S. 1957, § 1-46; Laws 1965, ch. 125, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1995, ch. 109, § 1.

Territorial scope of lis pendens. —

The doctrine of lis pendens has no efficacy outside the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the action is pending. Ludvik v. James S. Jackson Co., 635 P.2d 1135,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 381

(Wyo. 1981).

Effect on subsequent conveyances. —

From filing of lis pendens in suit to establish a trust in land in compliance with Wyoming statutes, the land was subjected to result of the suit, and all conveyances thereafter made were dominated by such result. Clarke v. Boysen, 264 F. 492, 1920 U.S. App. LEXIS 1278 (8th Cir. Wyo.), modified, Clarke v. Asmus Boysen Mining Co., 268 F. 535, 1920 U.S. App. LEXIS 2347 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1920).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lis pendens as applicable to suit for separation or dissolution of marriage, 65 ALR4th 522.

§ 1-6-109.
Lis pendens; record of notice.

The county clerk upon the filing of such notice shall record the notice in accordance with W.S. 18-3-402(a)(vi).

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 31, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 97-302; C.S. 1945, § 3-910; W.S. 1957, § 1-47; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “notice” for “same” and substituted “accordance with W.S. 18-3-402(a)(vi)” for “a book kept for that purpose”.

Cited

in

Grommet v. Newman, 2009 WY 150, 220 P.3d 795,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Dec. 10, 2009).

§ 1-6-110.
Transmission of process by telecommunications.

Any summons, writ or
order in any civil proceeding, and all other papers requiring service
may be transmitted by any form of telecommunication for service in
any place, and the copy of such writ, order or paper so transmitted
may be served or executed by the officer or person to whom it is sent
for that purpose and returned by him, if any return be requisite,
in the same manner and with the same force and effect as the original
thereof might be if delivered to him. The officer or person serving
or executing the same has the same authority and is subject to the
same liabilities as if the copy were the original. The original, when
a writ or order, must also be filed in the court from which it was
issued and a certified copy thereof shall be preserved in the telecommunication
office from which it is sent. In sending it, either the original or
certified copy may be used by the operator for that purpose. Whenever
any document to be sent by telecommunication bears a seal, either
private or official, it is not necessary for the operator to communicate
a description of the seal or any words or device thereon, but the
same may be expressed in the telecommunication by the letters “L.
S.” or by the word “Seal”.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 25, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4360; C.S. 1920, § 5629; R.S. 1931, § 89-810; C.S. 1945, § 3-1010; W.S. 1957, § 1-48; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 1-6-111.
Substitution of certified mail for registered mail.

Wherever required by
statute, rule of court or otherwise that service be made or notice
given by registered mail, such requirement may be satisfied by use
of certified mail and proof of mailing.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 73, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-48.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Request for return receipt not eliminated. —

There is nothing in this section which eliminates the requirement for requesting a return receipt signed by addressee only. Oedekoven v. Oedekoven, 475 P.2d 307,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1970).